Hawaii, session 2026, GM1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that according to
National Vital Statistics System data, Native Hawaiians and
other Pacific Islanders have one of the highest rates of fetal
death in the United States. Studies have shown that parents who
experience a fetal death can endure lasting psychological
trauma, with sixty to seventy per cent of grieving mothers
reporting clinically significant depression one year after their
baby's death. For some parents, these mental health struggles
are lifelong. Furthermore, psychological trauma associated with
fetal death has been shown to have societal effects such as
reduced earnings from employment or an inability to return to
paid employment.
The legislature further finds that the State lacks the
comprehensive, reliable data needed to understand and address
the causes behind the disparity in rates of fetal death among
Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islanders. Amending existing law
will address inconsistencies in reporting requirements, improve
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx
iiiiiinniiiiiiiiiiiiiiHiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
clarity and feasibility of reporting, and improve the quality of
fetal death data in Hawaii, which will in turn enable health
care providers to implement interventions to prevent and
decrease the rate of fetal death in the State's communities.
The legislature notes that existing law combines fetal
death reporting requirements with general death reporting
requirements, which creates ambiguity, operational burdens, and
privacy concerns. Existing law also mandates submission of a
report of fetal death to be submitted for every fetal death,
including first-trimester miscarriages. This requirement is
unrealistic, as these miscarriages can occur at home and will
never result in a complete or accurate dataset. Amendments are
therefore needed to align Hawaii's reporting requirements with
the majority of the United States and federal Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention recommendations by implementing a
minimum gestational age threshold for fetal death reporting.
Furthermore, making fetal death reporting optional in certain
specific circumstances will decrease the administrative burden
on the department of health and also support families who
experience a fetal death and would like this report to assist in
their healing process.
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx

Page 3
H.B. NO.
The legislature additionally finds that the current
timeframe to report a fetal death is only three days. Extending
this time frame is necessary so that health care providers have
sufficient time to comprehensively determine the cause of a
fetal death. This in turn will ensure that health care
providers are able to ascertain what is driving the high rates
of fetal death in the State. Amendments to existing law are
also necessary to clarify when a permit is required to dispose
of fetal remains, as this will improve consistency with fetal
death reporting requirements and ensure required reports of
fetal death are submitted to the department of health upon
disposition of fetal remains.
The legislature finds that improving the quality of fetal
death data in Hawaii will ultimately enable targeted prevention
and education efforts to reduce the State's fetal death rates
and the societal impacts experienced by families who endure this
tragic loss.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend the
various requirements in the event of a fetal death, including
registration of certain fetal deaths, filing and preparation of
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx
lilllligiHlllllilllHIMIIII

Page 4
H.B. NO.
a certificate of fetal death, and issuance of a permit for
removal, burial, or other disposition.
SECTION 2. Chapter 338, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding five new sections to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
'*§338-A Compulsory registration of certain fetal deaths.
(a) A certificate of fetal death for fetuses of twenty weeks'
gestation or more, calculated from the date the last normal
menstrual period began to the date of delivery, or based on the
best ultrasound measurement if last menstrual period is unknown,
or, if gestational age is unknown, for fetuses weighing at least
three hundred fifty grams, shall be filed with the department in
Honolulu or with the local agent of the department in the
district in which the fetal death occurred within fourteen days
after the date of fetal death. In these instances, a
certificate of fetal death shall be filed before interment or
other disposition of the body.
(b) A certificate of fetal death shall not be required for
a fetal death involving fetuses of less than twenty weeks'
2est^tAon2^ebuses wei2h ing l^ss than tliTee hundred^ifty 2ram^
if gestational age is unknown; or fetuses from an intentionally
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx

Page 5 1858
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
terminated pregnancy performed in accordance with section 453-16
or 457-8.7.
§338-B Filing and preparation of certificate of fetal
death. (a) The person in charge of the disposition of the body
shall file with the department in Honolulu or with the local
agent of the department in the district in which the fetal death
occurred a certificate of fetal death within fourteen days after
the date of fetal death; provided that neither the certificate
nor its filing shall be required for a fetal death involving
fetuses of less than twenty weeks' gestation; fetuses weighing
less than three hundred fifty grams^ if gestational age is
unknown; or fetuses from an intentionally terminated pregnancy
performed in accordance with section 453-16 or 457-8.7.
(b) In preparing a certificate of fetal death, the person
in charge of the disposition of the body shall;
(1) Obtain, and enter on the certificate, personal data
and other information as required by the department
pertaining to the deceased from the person best
qualified to provide this information; and
(2) Present the certificate of fetal death to the
£hys2^cianj^£hys ician aes2^sterit j adyanced pra£tice
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx .
llllllllltllHIIliillllillllllllll

Pages
H.B. NO.
registered nurse, or coroner's physician, who shall
certify the fetal death and furnished medical data
pertaining to the fetal death.
§338-C Documentation of fetal death for miscarriages less
than twenty weeks' gestation or three hundred fifty grams. (a)
The attending physician, physician assistant, advanced practice
registered nurse, or coroner's physician who certified the fetal
death due to miscarriage shall, upon request of the birthing
parent, issue documentation of fetal death to a birthing parent
who experienced a miscarriage that includes:
(1) A signed statement from the attending physician,
physician assistant, advanced practice registered
nurse, or coroner's physician confirming the
miscarriage; or
(2) An accurate copy of the birthing parent's medical
records related to the miscarriage.
(b) As used in this section, "miscarriage" means a product
of human conception that:
(1) Is less than twenty weeks' gestation, calculated from
the date the last normal menstrual period began to the
date of delivery or, if available, based on early
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx 6
iiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiMniiiii

Page 7
H.B. NO.
ultrasound, or, if the gestational age is unknown,
weighs less than three hundred fifty grams;
(2) Is not born alive; and
(3) Is not the result of an intentional termination of
pregnancy performed in accordance with section 453-16
or 457-8.7.
(c) Documentation of fetal death for a miscarriage issued
pursuant to this section shall not be prima facie evidence of
the facts stated in the documentation and shall have no valid
legal standing as a bona fide government record.
§338-D Late determination of the cause of fetal death.
(a) If the cause of fetal death cannot be determined within
fourteen days, the certification of its cause may be filed after
the prescribed period; provided that the attending physician,
physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or
coroner's physician shall notify, in writing, the local agent of
the department of the district in which the death occurred of
the reason for the late filing, so that a permit for the
disposition of the body may be issued.
(b) As used in this section, "late” means more than
fourteen days after the date of fetal death.
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx
■iiwgiiiiMHiiiiiiiiiiniii

Page 8
H.B. NO. S’?
§338-E Permit for removal, burial, or other disposition of
body due to fetal death. When a fetal death occurs, the body
shall not be disposed of or removed from the registration
district until a written permit has been issued by the local
agent of the department; provided that if;
(1) The fetal death occurred at less than twenty weeks of
gestation, or, if the gestational age is unknown, the
fetal death remains weigh less than three hundred
fifty grams; or
(2) The fetal death resulted from an intentional
termination of pregnancy performed in accordance with
section 453-16 or 457-8.7,
no permit shall be reguired."
SECTION 3. Section 338-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding three new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Advanced practice registered nurse" means a person
licensed pursuant to section 457-8.5.
"Department" means the department of health.
"Physician assistant" means a person licensed pursuant to
section 453-5.3."
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx

Page 9
H.B. NO.
SECTION 4. Section 338-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§338-2 Authority and duties of the department [e£
hea-lth] . The department [of health/—he^?eift-Hfe^e3H?ed—fee—as—the
department,] shall:
(1) Establish a central bureau of public health statistics
with suitable offices properly equipped for the safety
and preservation of all its official records;
(2) Install a statewide system of public health
statistics;
(3) [Mahe] Adopt and amend, after notice and hearing,
necessary [-gegulations, ] rules, and give instructions
and prescribe forms for collecting, transcribing,
compiling, and preserving public health statistics;
and
(4) Enforce this part and the [rcgulationo made] rules
adopted pursuant thereto."
SECTION 5. Section 338-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§338-8 Compulsory registration of deaths [and fotal
deaths]. [A] Except as provided in section 338-A, a certificate
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx
IIIIMIinillllllllHiilUII

Page 10 1858
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
of every death [or -fetal death] shall be filed with the
department [©f-4ieaifeh] in Honolulu or with the local agent of
the department [of health] in the district in which the death
[or fetal death] occurred or a dead body was found within three
days after the date of death [or fetal death occurred] or [-the]
date the dead body was found. In every instance, a certificate
shall be filed [pr4-ef^—fee] before interment or other disposition
of the body."
SECTION 6. Section 338-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§338-9 Filing and preparation of death [and fetal death]
certificates. (a) [The] Except as provided in section 338-B,
the person in charge of the disposition of the body shall file
with the department [of health] in Honolulu or with the local
IS agent of the department [of health] in the district in which the
death [o3?-fctal death] occurred [7-] or [a] the dead body was
found, a certificate of death [or fetal death] within three days
after the [oeeurisanec,—exeepfe—fedafe-Heeparfee—ef—iftfeeftfeieftai
terminationo of pregnancy performed in aoGordanco with oection
faay-^e—up—fee—©fte-moftfeh-T-] date of death or
date the dead body was found.
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx 10
loiiHiiiiiiiiiwiiiiigi

Page 11
H.B. NO.
(b) In preparing a certificate of death [or fetal death]
under this section, the person in charge of the disposition of
the body shall:
(1) Obtainjj_ and enter on the certificate [-fche]^ personal
data and other information as required by the
department pertaining to the deceased [per-een required
by the department] from the person best qualified to
[euppiy-^thefft?-] provide this information;
(2) Present the certificate of death to the physician,
physician assistant, or advanced practice registered
nurse last in attendance upon the deceased, or to the
coroner's physician, who shall [thereupon] certify the
cause of death to the physician's, physician
assistant's, [©^?] advanced practice registered
nurse's, or coroner's physician's best knowledge and
b e 1 i e f [ 7—or preoent the certificate of ■■■fetal deat-h to
the phyoician,—phyoician—a&oiotant,—advanced practice
■regiotered nuroc,—midwife,—or other peroon in
etteftdaftee—at—the fetal death,—who ohal-I certify the
■fetal death and such medical data pertaining thereto
ae—eaa-be—fasaiehedi—p^favided-^thett—fetat—deaths—et
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx 11
IIIIIIIIIHIIIHIIIHIIIIIIH

Page 12
H.B. NO.
Igso them twenty-four wocko or intentienal
torminationo of pregnaftey-pcrfo-rmod in accordanco with
seetien—4-&^—eer^fei^ied-by—a—
cmployoG baocd upon the phyoician'o rccordo]; and
(3) Notify immediately the appropriate local agent, if the
death occurred without medical attendance, or if the
physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice
registered nurse last in attendance fails to sign the
death certificate. In such event^ the local agent
shall inform the local health officer [7-] and refer the
case to the local health officer for immediate
investigation and certification of the cause of death
fee] before issuing a permit for burial, or
other disposition of the body. When the local health
officer is not a physician or when there is no [ouch]
local health officer, the local agent may complete the
certificate on the basis of information received from
relatives of the deceased or others having knowledge
of the facts.
If the circumstances of the case suggest that the death
fetal—death] was caused by other than natural causes, the local
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx 12

Page 13
H.B. NO.
agent shall refer the case to the coroner for investigation and
certification.
(c) A death certificate under this section may be filed by
the next of kin and accepted by the local agent without meeting
the requirements set forth [above] in this section when there
has been a judicial finding and declaration by a court of record
that a person is dead; provided that the certificate [ie] shall
be in a form approved by the department and [baa] shall have
been certified by the clerk of court."
SECTION 7. Section 338-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§338-10 Late determination o£ the cause of death. [^]
(a) Except as provided in section 338-D, if the cause of death
cannot be determined within three days, the certification of its
cause may be filed after the prescribed period[7—bab]; provided
that the attending physician, physician assistant, advanced
practice registered nurse, or coroner's physician shall notify^
in writing^, the local agent of the department [ef—beaibb] of the
district in which the death occurred of the reason for the late
filing, [i«—order] that a permit for the disposition of the
body may be issued.
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx 13
iHHiiimiimiiHiiuaiBi

Page 14
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
(b) As used in this section, "late" means more than three
days after the date of death."
SECTION 8. Section 338-23, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§338-23 Pexrmit for removal, burial, or other disposition
of body. [When] Except as provided in section 338-E, when a
death [or fetal death] occurs or a dead body is found, the body
shall not be disposed of or removed from the registration
district until a written permit has been issued by the local
agent of the department [of health,—except' that if the dead
fetuo io less than-twenty-four weeks of gestation,—ne-peeffti-t
ohall be required and except]; provided that if the death
occurred as a result of an accident or other casualty
occurrence, the local agent of the department [of health] may
orally authorize the dead [hediee] body to be removed from a
registration district and airlifted or otherwise directly
transported to the Honolulu registration district for the
preparation and filing of the death [cortifieates] certificate
and the issuance of a written [pe«ft4^d&] permit for further
disposition."
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx 14
lilllRIIIIIIIIIIIHnillMIMIi

Page 15
H.B. NO. g’?
SECTION 9. Section 338-25, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§338-25 Prerequisite for permit. No permit under section
338-23 or 338-E shall be issued until a certificate of death or
certificate of fetal death, as far as it can be completed under
the circumstances of the case, has been filed and until all the
[•j?eguia-fei©fts-] rules of the department [of health in roopoct]
relating to the issuance of [eueh] tl^ permit have been complied
with."
SECTION 10. Sections 338-3, 338-4, 338-5, 338-6, 338-7,
338-11, 338-11.5, 338-13, 338-14, 338-14.3, 338-14.5, 338-14.6,
338-15, 338-16, 338-17.7, 338-18, 338-19, 338-20, 338-20.5,
338-21, 338-24, 338-25.5, 338-28, and 338-29.5, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, are amended by substituting the term "department", or
similar term, wherever the term "department of health", or
similar term, appears, as the context requires.
SECTION 11. In codifying the new sections added by
section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx

Page 16
H.B. NO.
SECTION 12. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 13. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-1818 HB1858 SDl SMA.docx 16
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiMHiinii

H.B. NO.
* ’ ' S.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1858, HD 2, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1858, H.D. 2, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAFI
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3754